Utah statutes.
63A-4-104.   Course-of-construction insurance for facilities constructed by This is the Place Foundation.

The risk manager may provide course-of-construction insurance for facilities constructed by This is the Place Foundation at This is the Place State Park and bill the Division of Parks and Recreation for the cost of the insurance.

